hunspell_ru_ru_aot/ru_ru_aot.affix
FLAG num
SFX 400 Y 133
SFX 400 ить ить .
SFX 400 ить у .
SFX 400 ить им .
SFX 400 ить ишь .
SFX 400 ить ите .
SFX 400 ить ит .
SFX 400 ить ат .
SFX 400 ить ил .
SFX 400 ить ила .
SFX 400 ить ило .
SFX 400 ить или .
SFX 400 ить а .
SFX 400 ить ив .
SFX 400 ить ивши .
SFX 400 ить ь .
SFX 400 ить ьте .
SFX 400 ить ащий .
SFX 400 ить ащего .
SFX 400 ить ащему .
SFX 400 ить ащего .
SFX 400 ить ащий .
SFX 400 ить ащим .
SFX 400 ить ащем .
SFX 400 ить ащая .
SFX 400 ить ащей .
SFX 400 ить ащей .
SFX 400 ить ащую .
SFX 400 ить ащей .
SFX 400 ить ащею .
SFX 400 ить ащей .
SFX 400 ить ащее .
SFX 400 ить ащего .
SFX 400 ить ащему .
SFX 400 ить ащее .
SFX 400 ить ащим .
SFX 400 ить ащем .
SFX 400 ить ащие .
SFX 400 ить ащих .
SFX 400 ить ащим .
SFX 400 ить ащих .
SFX 400 ить ащие .
SFX 400 ить ащими .
SFX 400 ить ащих .
SFX 400 ить ивший .
SFX 400 ить ившего .
SFX 400 ить ившему .
SFX 400 ить ившего .
SFX 400 ить ивший .
SFX 400 ить ившим .
SFX 400 ить ившем .
SFX 400 ить ившая .
SFX 400 ить ившей .
SFX 400 ить ившей .
SFX 400 ить ившую .
SFX 400 ить ившей .
SFX 400 ить ившею .
SFX 400 ить ившей .
SFX 400 ить ившее .
SFX 400 ить ившего .
SFX 400 ить ившему .
SFX 400 ить ившее .
SFX 400 ить ившим .
SFX 400 ить ившем .
SFX 400 ить ившие .
SFX 400 ить ивших .
SFX 400 ить ившим .
SFX 400 ить ивших .
SFX 400 ить ившие .
SFX 400 ить ившими .
SFX 400 ить ивших .
SFX 400 ить имый .
SFX 400 ить имого .
SFX 400 ить имому .
SFX 400 ить имого .
SFX 400 ить имый .
SFX 400 ить имым .
SFX 400 ить имом .
SFX 400 ить им .
SFX 400 ить имая .
SFX 400 ить имой .
SFX 400 ить имой .
SFX 400 ить имую .
SFX 400 ить имой .
SFX 400 ить имою .
SFX 400 ить имой .
SFX 400 ить има .
SFX 400 ить имое .
SFX 400 ить имого .
SFX 400 ить имому .
SFX 400 ить имое .
SFX 400 ить имым .
SFX 400 ить имом .
SFX 400 ить имо .
SFX 400 ить имые .
SFX 400 ить имых .
SFX 400 ить имым .
SFX 400 ить имых .
SFX 400 ить имые .
SFX 400 ить имыми .
SFX 400 ить имых .
SFX 400 ить имы .
SFX 400 ить енный .
SFX 400 ить енного .
SFX 400 ить енному .
SFX 400 ить енного .
SFX 400 ить енный .
SFX 400 ить енным .
SFX 400 ить енном .
SFX 400 ить ен .
SFX 400 ить енная .
SFX 400 ить енной .
SFX 400 ить енной .
SFX 400 ить енную .
SFX 400 ить енной .
SFX 400 ить енною .
SFX 400 ить енной .
SFX 400 ить ена .
SFX 400 ить енное .
SFX 400 ить енного .
SFX 400 ить енному .
SFX 400 ить енное .
SFX 400 ить енным .
SFX 400 ить енном .
SFX 400 ить ено .
SFX 400 ить енные .
SFX 400 ить енных .
SFX 400 ить енным .
SFX 400 ить енных .
SFX 400 ить енные .
SFX 400 ить енными .
SFX 400 ить енных .
SFX 400 ить ены .
SFX 400 ить ованные .

SFX 402 Y 14
SFX 402 я я .
SFX 402 я и .
SFX 402 я е .
SFX 402 я ю .
SFX 402 я ей .
SFX 402 я ею .
SFX 402 я е .
SFX 402 я и .
SFX 402 я ей .
SFX 402 я ям .
SFX 402 я и .
SFX 402 я ями .
SFX 402 я ях .
SFX 402 я ивши .

SFX 406 Y 28
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой ого .
SFX 406 ой ому .
SFX 406 ой ого .
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой им .
SFX 406 ой ом .
SFX 406 ой ая .
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой ую .
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой ою .
SFX 406 ой ой .
SFX 406 ой ое .
SFX 406 ой ого .
SFX 406 ой ому .
SFX 406 ой ое .
SFX 406 ой им .
SFX 406 ой ом .
SFX 406 ой ие .
SFX 406 ой их .
SFX 406 ой им .
SFX 406 ой их .
SFX 406 ой ие .
SFX 406 ой ими .
SFX 406 ой их .
SFX 406 ой ащей .

SFX 423 Y 102
SFX 423 сить сить .
SFX 423 сить шу .
SFX 423 сить сим .
SFX 423 сить сишь .
SFX 423 сить сите .
SFX 423 сить сит .
SFX 423 сить сят .
SFX 423 сить сил .
SFX 423 сить сила .
SFX 423 сить сило .
SFX 423 сить сили .
SFX 423 сить ся .
SFX 423 сить сив .
SFX 423 сить сивши .
SFX 423 сить си .
SFX 423 сить сите .
SFX 423 сить сящий .
SFX 423 сить сящего .
SFX 423 сить сящему .
SFX 423 сить сящего .
SFX 423 сить сящий .
SFX 423 сить сящим .
SFX 423 сить сящем .
SFX 423 сить сящая .
SFX 423 сить сящей .
SFX 423 сить сящей .
SFX 423 сить сящую .
SFX 423 сить сящей .
SFX 423 сить сящею .
SFX 423 сить сящей .
SFX 423 сить сящее .
SFX 423 сить сящего .
SFX 423 сить сящему .
SFX 423 сить сящее .
SFX 423 сить сящим .
SFX 423 сить сящем .
SFX 423 сить сящие .
SFX 423 сить сящих .
SFX 423 сить сящим .
SFX 423 сить сящих .
SFX 423 сить сящие .
SFX 423 сить сящими .
SFX 423 сить сящих .
SFX 423 сить сивший .
SFX 423 сить сившего .
SFX 423 сить сившему .
SFX 423 сить сившего .
SFX 423 сить сивший .
SFX 423 сить сившим .
SFX 423 сить сившем .
SFX 423 сить сившая .
SFX 423 сить сившей .
SFX 423 сить сившей .
SFX 423 сить сившую .
SFX 423 сить сившей .
SFX 423 сить сившею .
SFX 423 сить сившей .
SFX 423 сить сившее .
SFX 423 сить сившего .
SFX 423 сить сившему .
SFX 423 сить сившее .
SFX 423 сить сившим .
SFX 423 сить сившем .
SFX 423 сить сившие .
SFX 423 сить сивших .
SFX 423 сить сившим .
SFX 423 сить сивших .
SFX 423 сить сившие .
SFX 423 сить сившими .
SFX 423 сить сивших .
SFX 423 сить симый .
SFX 423 сить симого .
SFX 423 сить симому .
SFX 423 сить симого .
SFX 423 сить симый .
SFX 423 сить симым .
SFX 423 сить симом .
SFX 423 сить сим .
SFX 423 сить симая .
SFX 423 сить симой .
SFX 423 сить симой .
SFX 423 сить симую .
SFX 423 сить симой .
SFX 423 сить симою .
SFX 423 сить симой .
SFX 423 сить сима .
SFX 423 сить симое .
SFX 423 сить симого .
SFX 423 сить симому .
SFX 423 сить симое .
SFX 423 сить симым .
SFX 423 сить симом .
SFX 423 сить симо .
SFX 423 сить симые .
SFX 423 сить симых .
SFX 423 сить симым .
SFX 423 сить симых .
SFX 423 сить симые .
SFX 423 сить симыми .
SFX 423 сить симых .
SFX 423 сить симы .
SFX 423 сить енный .

SFX 424 Y 13
SFX 424 ёк ёк .
SFX 424 ёк ька .
SFX 424 ёк ьку .
SFX 424 ёк ёк .
SFX 424 ёк ьком .
SFX 424 ёк ьке .
SFX 424 ёк ьки .
SFX 424 ёк ьков .
SFX 424 ёк ькам .
SFX 424 ёк ьки .
SFX 424 ёк ьками .
SFX 424 ёк ьках .
SFX 424 ёк сив .

SFX 438 Y 76
SFX 438 ть ть .
SFX 438 ть л .
SFX 438 ть ла .
SFX 438 ть ло .
SFX 438 ть ли .
SFX 438 ть ю .
SFX 438 ть ем .
SFX 438 ть ешь .
SFX 438 ть ете .
SFX 438 ть ет .
SFX 438 ть ют .
SFX 438 ть в .
SFX 438 ть вши .
SFX 438 ть ем .
SFX 438 ть емте .
SFX 438 ть й .
SFX 438 ть йте .
SFX 438 ть вший .
SFX 438 ть вшего .
SFX 438 ть вшему .
SFX 438 ть вшего .
SFX 438 ть вший .
SFX 438 ть вшим .
SFX 438 ть вшем .
SFX 438 ть вшая .
SFX 438 ть вшей .
SFX 438 ть вшей .
SFX 438 ть вшую .
SFX 438 ть вшей .
SFX 438 ть вшею .
SFX 438 ть вшей .
SFX 438 ть вшее .
SFX 438 ть вшего .
SFX 438 ть вшему .
SFX 438 ть вшее .
SFX 438 ть вшим .
SFX 438 ть вшем .
SFX 438 ть вшие .
SFX 438 ть вших .
SFX 438 ть вшим .
SFX 438 ть вших .
SFX 438 ть вшие .
SFX 438 ть вшими .
SFX 438 ть вших .
SFX 438 ть нный .
SFX 438 ть нного .
SFX 438 ть нному .
SFX 438 ть нного .
SFX 438 ть нный .
SFX 438 ть нным .
SFX 438 ть нном .
SFX 438 ть н .
SFX 438 ть нная .
SFX 438 ть нной .
SFX 438 ть нной .
SFX 438 ть нную .
SFX 438 ть нной .
SFX 438 ть нною .
SFX 438 ть нной .
SFX 438 ть на .
SFX 438 ть нное .
SFX 438 ть нного .
SFX 438 ть нному .
SFX 438 ть нное .
SFX 438 ть нным .
SFX 438 ть нном .
SFX 438 ть но .
SFX 438 ть нные .
SFX 438 ть нных .
SFX 438 ть нным .
SFX 438 ть нных .
SFX 438 ть нные .
SFX 438 ть нными .
SFX 438 ть нных .
SFX 438 ть ны .
SFX 438 ть симым .

SFX 439 Y 44
SFX 439 ться ться .
SFX 439 ться лся .
SFX 439 ться лась .
SFX 439 ться лось .
SFX 439 ться лись .
SFX 439 ться юсь .
SFX 439 ться емся .
SFX 439 ться ешься .
SFX 439 ться етесь .
SFX 439 ться ется .
SFX 439 ться ются .
SFX 439 ться вшись .
SFX 439 ться емся .
SFX 439 ться емтесь .
SFX 439 ться йся .
SFX 439 ться йтесь .
SFX 439 ться вшийся .
SFX 439 ться вшегося .
SFX 439 ться вшемуся .
SFX 439 ться вшегося .
SFX 439 ться вшийся .
SFX 439 ться вшимся .
SFX 439 ться вшемся .
SFX 439 ться вшаяся .
SFX 439 ться вшейся .
SFX 439 ться вшейся .
SFX 439 ться вшуюся .
SFX 439 ться вшейся .
SFX 439 ться вшеюся .
SFX 439 ться вшейся .
SFX 439 ться вшееся .
SFX 439 ться вшегося .
SFX 439 ться вшемуся .
SFX 439 ться вшееся .
SFX 439 ться вшимся .
SFX 439 ться вшемся .
SFX 439 ться вшиеся .
SFX 439 ться вшихся .
SFX 439 ться вшимся .
SFX 439 ться вшихся .
SFX 439 ться вшиеся .
SFX 439 ться вшимися .
SFX 439 ться вшихся .
SFX 439 ться вших .

SFX 440 Y 69
SFX 440 ться ться .
SFX 440 ться юсь .
SFX 440 ться емся .
SFX 440 ться ешься .
SFX 440 ться етесь .
SFX 440 ться ется .
SFX 440 ться ются .
SFX 440 ться лся .
SFX 440 ться лась .
SFX 440 ться лось .
SFX 440 ться лись .
SFX 440 ться ясь .
SFX 440 ться йся .
SFX 440 ться йтесь .
SFX 440 ться ющийся .
SFX 440 ться ющегося .
SFX 440 ться ющемуся .
SFX 440 ться ющегося .
SFX 440 ться ющийся .
SFX 440 ться ющимся .
SFX 440 ться ющемся .
SFX 440 ться ющаяся .
SFX 440 ться ющейся .
SFX 440 ться ющейся .
SFX 440 ться ющуюся .
SFX 440 ться ющейся .
SFX 440 ться ющеюся .
SFX 440 ться ющейся .
SFX 440 ться ющееся .
SFX 440 ться ющегося .
SFX 440 ться ющемуся .
SFX 440 ться ющееся .
SFX 440 ться ющимся .
SFX 440 ться ющемся .
SFX 440 ться ющиеся .
SFX 440 ться ющихся .
SFX 440 ться ющимся .
SFX 440 ться ющихся .
SFX 440 ться ющиеся .
SFX 440 ться ющимися .
SFX 440 ться ющихся .
SFX 440 ться вшийся .
SFX 440 ться вшегося .
SFX 440 ться вшемуся .
SFX 440 ться вшегося .
SFX 440 ться вшийся .
SFX 440 ться вшимся .
SFX 440 ться вшемся .
SFX 440 ться вшаяся .
SFX 440 ться вшейся .
SFX 440 ться вшейся .
SFX 440 ться вшуюся .
SFX 440 ться вшейся .
SFX 440 ться вшеюся .
SFX 440 ться вшейся .
SFX 440 ться вшееся .
SFX 440 ться вшегося .
SFX 440 ться вшемуся .
SFX 440 ться вшееся .
SFX 440 ться вшимся .
SFX 440 ться вшемся .
SFX 440 ться вшиеся .
SFX 440 ться вшихся .
SFX 440 ться вшимся .
SFX 440 ться вшихся .
SFX 440 ться вшиеся .
SFX 440 ться вшимися .
SFX 440 ться вшихся .
SFX 440 ться нных .

SFX 441 Y 45
SFX 441 иться иться .
SFX 441 иться ился .
SFX 441 иться илась .
SFX 441 иться илось .
SFX 441 иться ились .
SFX 441 иться юсь .
SFX 441 иться имся .
SFX 441 иться ишься .
SFX 441 иться итесь .
SFX 441 иться ится .
SFX 441 иться ятся .
SFX 441 иться ившись .
SFX 441 иться ясь .
SFX 441 иться имся .
SFX 441 иться имтесь .
SFX 441 иться ись .
SFX 441 иться итесь .
SFX 441 иться ившийся .
SFX 441 иться ившегося .
SFX 441 иться ившемуся .
SFX 441 иться ившегося .
SFX 441 иться ившийся .
SFX 441 иться ившимся .
SFX 441 иться ившемся .
SFX 441 иться ившаяся .
SFX 441 иться ившейся .
SFX 441 иться ившейся .
SFX 441 иться ившуюся .
SFX 441 иться ившейся .
SFX 441 иться ившеюся .
SFX 441 иться ившейся .
SFX 441 иться ившееся .
SFX 441 иться ившегося .
SFX 441 иться ившемуся .
SFX 441 иться ившееся .
SFX 441 иться ившимся .
SFX 441 иться ившемся .
SFX 441 иться ившиеся .
SFX 441 иться ившихся .
SFX 441 иться ившимся .
SFX 441 иться ившихся .
SFX 441 иться ившиеся .
SFX 441 иться ившимися .
SFX 441 иться ившихся .
SFX 441 иться вшегося .

SFX 444 Y 44
SFX 444 зиться зиться .
SFX 444 зиться зился .
SFX 444 зиться зилась .
SFX 444 зиться зилось .
SFX 444 зиться зились .
SFX 444 зиться жусь .
SFX 444 зиться зимся .
SFX 444 зиться зишься .
SFX 444 зиться зитесь .
SFX 444 зиться зится .
SFX 444 зиться зятся .
SFX 444 зиться зившись .
SFX 444 зиться зимся .
SFX 444 зиться зимтесь .
SFX 444 зиться зись .
SFX 444 зиться зитесь .
SFX 444 зиться зившийся .
SFX 444 зиться зившегося .
SFX 444 зиться зившемуся .
SFX 444 зиться зившегося .
SFX 444 зиться зившийся .
SFX 444 зиться зившимся .
SFX 444 зиться зившемся .
SFX 444 зиться зившаяся .
SFX 444 зиться зившейся .
SFX 444 зиться зившейся .
SFX 444 зиться зившуюся .
SFX 444 зиться зившейся .
SFX 444 зиться зившеюся .
SFX 444 зиться зившейся .
SFX 444 зиться зившееся .
SFX 444 зиться зившегося .
SFX 444 зиться зившемуся .
SFX 444 зиться зившееся .
SFX 444 зиться зившимся .
SFX 444 зиться зившемся .
SFX 444 зиться зившиеся .
SFX 444 зиться зившихся .
SFX 444 зиться зившимся .
SFX 444 зиться зившихся .
SFX 444 зиться зившиеся .
SFX 444 зиться зившимися .
SFX 444 зиться зившихся .
SFX 444 зиться ившихся .
